Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1042
Local governing body, defined.

Local governing body means a county board, city council of a city, board of trustees of a village, board of directors of any rural or suburban fire protection district, or any governing body of an entity created pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act.

Laws 2016, LB938, § 13;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1013;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 24.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.